Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
PART 8 Employees of the Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund

47-2-280.
Credit for previous service as an employee of the Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund; contributions.

Anything in this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, any member with prior service credits who previously was employed by the Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund shall be eligible to receive credit for such service with the Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund by paying the regular employer and employee’s contribution, including regular interest that would have accumulated on those contributions during such period of employment. In the computation of such contributions and interest, the compensation of such member shall be deemed to have been the same as the compensation such member received on the date of first becoming a member.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 701, § 1.